Yik Yak Terms of Service & Privacy Policy
EFFECTIVE DATE: January 24, 2023
Thanks for reading. These Yik Yak Terms of Service (the “Terms”) are a legal contract between you and Yik Yak, Inc. (“Yik Yak,” “we” or “us”). You represent that you have the power and authority to agree to these Terms.  These Terms explain how you are permitted to use the Yik Yak mobile application and services, as well as the Yik Yak website located at
yikyak.com
(the “Site”) and any content therein (collectively, the “Services”). Unless otherwise specified, all references to the Services include the services available through the Yik Yak mobile application (the “App”) and the Site, as well as any software that Yik Yak provides to you that allows you to access the Services from a mobile device and any other Materials (as defined below). By browsing, accessing, linking, streaming, viewing, using or downloading information from our Services, you agree to these Terms, our
Privacy Policy
, our
Cookies Policy
, and any additional terms and conditions that may apply to specific sections of the Services.  If you do not agree with any of these Terms, do not access or otherwise use the Services. If you are using the Services on behalf of another person or are a parent or guardian of the minor user of the Services, you represent that you are authorized to accept these Terms on that person’s behalf.  You may download and/or print a copy of these Terms for your records at:
yikyak.com/terms
.
Important Note: These Terms contain a dispute resolution and arbitration provision, including class action waiver, which affects your rights under these Terms and with respect to any dispute you may have with Yik Yak. You may opt out of the binding individual arbitration and class action waiver as provided below.
Yik Yak may make changes, update, or add or remove provisions to these Terms at any time  by posting the updated Terms on applicable Services, or by notifying you via the App or any other method. By using the Services after Yik Yak has updated the Terms, you are agreeing to all of the updated Terms; if you do not agree with any of the updated Terms, you must stop using the Services.
In addition, we may, for any or no reason and at our discretion, modify, disable, or discontinue operation of the Services or your access to the Services without notice and without liability to you or any other party.  Reasons for termination may include provision of false or misleading registration information, interference with other users or the administration of our services, or violation of these Terms or any of our other policies or agreements.  Upon denial of access, you agree not to attempt to access the Services.  Termination will not limit any of our other rights or remedies.  We also may limit your use of the Services, including, for example, limits on the amount of content you upload or the number of posts you make and your frequency of access.
The Services may not be available in all locations, and we may block access to the Services from certain locations based on your device’s geolocation information. We may add or remove the areas in which the Services are not available at any time, without notice to you.
By using the Services, you represent, acknowledge and agree that you are at least 13 years of age. If you are not at least 13 years old, you may not use the Services at any time or in any manner or submit any information to the App, the Site or any part of the Services.  If you are between the ages of 13 and 18, you may only use the Services with the approval of a parent or guardian.
We may, in our sole discretion, refuse to offer the Services to any person or entity. We may, without notice and in our sole discretion, terminate your right to use the Services, or any portion thereof, and block or prevent your future access to and use of the Services or any portion thereof.
The Services and their entire contents, features and functionality (including, without limitation, all information, software, text, text graphics, displays, images, photos, video, audio, music, songs, recordings, digital downloads, graphics, “look and feel,” trademarks, logos, and trade dress, and the design, selection and arrangement of those elements (collectively, the “Materials”)), are owned by us, our licensors, or other providers of such material and are protected by United States and international copyright, trademark, patent, trade secret and other intellectual property or proprietary rights laws.  The mark YIK YAK
and all logos incorporating the mark, and certain of the other names, marks, and logos on the Services are trademarks and service marks owned or controlled by us.  All goodwill generated from use of our marks will inure to our exclusive benefit.
Subject to these Terms, Yik Yak hereby grants you a personal, limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable and revocable license to use and to display the Materials and the Services solely for your personal, non-commercial use. Except for the foregoing license, you have no other rights in the Services or any Materials and you may not modify, edit, copy, reproduce, create derivative works of, reverse engineer, alter, enhance or in any way exploit any of the Services or Materials in any manner.
You may use the App for one registered account on one mobile device owned or leased solely by you, for your personal, non-commercial use. You may not: (i) modify, disassemble, decompile or reverse engineer the App, except to the extent that such restriction is expressly prohibited by law; (ii) rent, lease, loan, resell, sublicense, distribute or otherwise transfer the App to any third-party or use the App to provide time sharing or similar services for any third-party; (iii) make any copies of the App; (iv) remove, circumvent, disable, damage or otherwise interfere with security-related features of the App, features that prevent or restrict use or copying of any content accessible through the App, or features that enforce limitations on use of the App; or (v) delete the copyright and other proprietary rights notices on the App. You acknowledge that Yik Yak may from time to time issue upgraded versions of the App and may automatically electronically upgrade the version of the App that you are using on your mobile device. You consent to such automatic upgrading on your mobile device and agree that these Terms will apply to all such upgrades. Standard carrier data charges may apply to your use of the App.
Except for the limited rights expressly licensed in these Terms, Yik Yak and its third-party licensors or suppliers retain all right, title, and interest in and to the Services.
In order to use our App, you will be required to create a user account.  You are responsible for using the settings available to protect the confidentiality of your personal information.  You are responsible for all uses of your account, whether or not you have authorized them.  You agree to provide, maintain and update true, accurate, current, and complete information about yourself in the registration process.  You may not impersonate any person or entity or misrepresent your identity or affiliation with any person or entity, including using another person’s account information.  You agree to promptly notify us of unauthorized use of your account information or any other breach of security that you suspect or become aware of involving or relating to the Services.  Our Services may offer you the opportunity to share content on third-party applications or websites.  We do not control such services and are not responsible for them.  We fully disclaim all liability associated with them.
Yik Yak offers software applications that may be made available through the Apple App Store, the Google Play Store or other distribution channels (“Distribution Channels”). If you obtain such software through a Distribution Channel, you may be subject to additional terms of the Distribution Channel. These Terms of Service are between you and us only, and not with the Distribution Channel. To the extent that you utilize any other third-party products and services in connection with your use of our Services, you agree to comply with all applicable terms of any agreement for such third-party products and services.
With respect to Software that is made available for your use in connection with an Apple
-branded product (such software, “Apple-Enabled Software”), in addition to the other terms and conditions set forth in these Terms of Service, the following terms and conditions apply:
You acknowledge that these Terms are between you and Yik Yak only, and not with Apple, Inc. (“Apple”), and that as between Yik Yak and Apple, Yik Yak, not Apple, is solely responsible for the Apple-Enabled Software and the content thereof.
Your use of the Apple-Enabled Software must comply with Apple’s then-current App Store Terms of Service.
You may not use the Apple-Enabled Software in any manner that is in violation of or inconsistent with the Usage Rules set forth for Apple-Enabled Software in, or otherwise be in conflict with, the App Store Terms of Service.
You acknowledge that Apple has no obligation to provide maintenance and support services with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Apple will have no warranty obligation whatsoever with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software.
You agree that Yik Yak, and not Apple, is responsible for addressing any claims by you or any third party relating to the Apple-Enabled Software or your possession and/or use of that Apple-Enabled Software.
You agree that Yik Yak, and not Apple, shall be solely responsible, to the extent required by these Terms, for the investigation, defense, settlement and discharge of any third-party intellectual property infringement claim in the event that the Apple-Enabled Software or the end-user’s possession and use of that Apple-Enabled Software infringes that third party’s intellectual property rights.
You represent and warrant that (i) you are not located in a country that is subject to a U.S. Government embargo, or that has been designated by the U.S. Government as a “terrorist supporting” country; and (ii) you are not listed on any U.S. Government list of prohibited or restricted parties.
You agree to comply with all applicable third-party terms of agreement when using the Apple-Enabled Software (e.g., you must not be in violation of your wireless data service terms of agreement when using the Apple-Enabled Software).
You and we agree that Apple and Apple’s subsidiaries are third-party beneficiaries to these Terms with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software. Upon your acceptance of these Terms, Apple will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to enforce these Terms against you with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software as a third-party beneficiary thereof.
The following additional terms and conditions apply with respect to any Mobile Application that Yik Yak provides to you designed for use on an Android-powered mobile device (an “Android App”):
You acknowledge that these Terms are between you and Yik Yak only, and not with Google, Inc. (“Google”).
Your use of Yik Yak’s Android App must comply with Google’s then-current Android Market Terms of Service.
Google is only a provider of the Android Market where you obtained the Android App. Yik Yak, and not Google, are solely responsible for Yik Yak’s Android App and the Services and Content available thereon. Google has no obligation or liability to you with respect to Yik Yak’s Android App or these Terms.
You acknowledge and agree that Google is a third-party beneficiary to the Terms as they relate to Yik Yak’s Android App.
The following additional terms and conditions apply with respect to any Mobile Application that Yik Yak provides to you designed for use on an Android-powered mobile device (an “Android App”):
You acknowledge that these Terms are between you and Yik Yak only, and not with Google, Inc. (“Google”).
Your use of Yik Yak’s Android App must comply with Google’s then-current Android Market Terms of Service.
Google is only a provider of the Android Market where you obtained the Android App. Yik Yak, and not Google, are solely responsible for Yik Yak’s Android App and the Services and Content available thereon. Google has no obligation or liability to you with respect to Yik Yak’s Android App or these Terms.
You acknowledge and agree that Google is a third-party beneficiary to the Terms as they relate to Yik Yak’s Android App.
If you breach any of these Terms, the above license will terminate automatically, and you must immediately stop using the Services and destroy any downloaded or printed Materials.
The Services include certain services, including the App and the Site, that are available via a mobile device, including (i) the ability to upload content to the Service via a mobile device, (ii) the ability to browse the Service from a mobile device and (iii) the ability to access features through an application downloaded and installed on a mobile device (collectively, the “Mobile Services”). To the extent you access the Service through a mobile device, your wireless service carrier’s standard charges, data rates and other fees may apply. In addition, downloading, installing, or using certain Mobile Services may be prohibited or restricted by your carrier, and not all Mobile Services may work with all carriers or devices. By using the Mobile Services, you agree that we may communicate with you regarding Yik Yak and other entities by SMS, MMS, text message or other electronic means to your mobile device and that certain information about your usage of the Mobile Services may be communicated to us. In the event you change or deactivate your mobile telephone number, you agree to promptly update your Yik Yak account information to ensure that your messages are not sent to the person that acquires your old number.
We respect your privacy and will handle your personal information pursuant to our
Privacy Policy
.  By using our Services, you consent to the collection and use of personal information submitted by you in accordance with our Privacy Policy.  You acknowledge that transmission of information by the Internet is never completely secure.  Except as otherwise stated in our Privacy Policy, we do not guarantee the security of any information transmitted to or from our Services, including to or from any external sites linked to our Services, and submission of any information to our Services or to any external sites linked to our Services is your risk and responsibility. Without limiting the foregoing, you expressly acknowledge that any Submissions (defined below) you submit to the Services may be viewable by all other users of the Services and any third party.
You are responsible for any information, opinions, messages, comments, and other content or material that you submit, upload, post or otherwise make available on, through or in connection with the Services (each a “Submission”)
.
When you provide Submissions, you agree that those Submissions shall not be in violation of the “Safety” section below or the Community Guardrails. Although Yik Yak may, in its sole discretion, monitor, screen, modify, refuse, remove or edit Submissions for any reason, Yik Yak is not obligated to do so. You have full responsibility for each Submission you make, including its legality, reliability and appropriateness, and will be solely liable for any damage or harm resulting from your Submissions.
Subject to our Privacy Policy, we may retain your Submissions, even after they have expired from view within the Services or even after you have deleted them. However, you agree that we have no obligation to retain any Submission for any period of time, nor shall we be responsible or liable to you or any third party for any lost content or losses related to the expiration or deletion of a Submission.
Unless otherwise explicitly stated herein or in the Privacy Policy (including personally identifying information, the treatment of which is described in the Privacy Policy), you agree that any Submission provided by you in connection with the Services is provided on a non-proprietary and non-confidential basis. You hereby grant to Yik Yak a non-exclusive, perpetual, irrevocable, royalty-free, fully paid-up, worldwide license (including the right to sublicense through multiple tiers) to use, reproduce, process, adapt, publicly perform, publicly display, modify, prepare derivative works, publish, transmit and distribute each of your Submissions, or any portion thereof, in any form, medium or distribution method now known or hereafter existing, known or developed, and authorize others to do the same (“Submission License”). Without limiting the foregoing, you agree that the Submission License gives Yik Yak the right to sublicense Submissions to third parties in connection with the syndication, broadcast, distribution, promotion, or publication of Submissions in any and all media or distribution methods, now known or later developed. No use of Submissions in accordance with the Submission License shall entitle you to any compensation from Yik Yak, or any third party. You agree to pay for all royalties, fees, damages and any other monies owing any person by reason of any Submissions posted by you to or through the Services.
At Yik Yak, we value your safety and try hard to keep our Services a safe place for all users. But we can’t guarantee it. That’s where you come in. By using the Services, you agree that:
You will not violate any law, contract, intellectual property or other third-party right or unlawfully injure another person or their property, and that you are solely responsible for your conduct while on the Services and you use the Services at your own risk.
You will not post, store, create or otherwise publish or send through the Services any User Content that violates our
Community Guardrails
, which we may update from time to time.
You will not impersonate another person in a manner that is intended to or does mislead, confuse or deceive others.
You will not post or share another individual’s private information without their express authorization and permission.
You will not attempt to indicate that you have a relationship with Yik Yak or that Yik Yak has endorsed you or any products or services.
You will not defame, abuse, bully, harass, stalk, threaten, or otherwise violate the legal rights of others.
You will not use racially or ethnically offensive language.
You will not discuss or incite illegal or violent activity.
You will not post or share Submissions that contain pornography or graphic violence.
You will not post or share Submissions that exploit children or minors or that depict cruelty to animals.
You will not post or share Submissions that violate any third-party right, including any copyright, trademark, patent, trade secret, moral right, privacy right, right of publicity or any other intellectual property or proprietary right.
You will not disseminate any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, junk mai', spam, chain letters, pyramid schemes, or any other form of such solicitation.
You will not use any robot, spider, crawler, scraper or other automated means to access the Services.
You will not take any action that imposes an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure.
You will not use or develop any third-party applications that interact with the Services or Submissions without our prior written consent.
You will not alter the opinions or comments posted by others on the Services.
You will not post or share any image or language that is obscene, vulgar or offensive or that threatens, disparages or demeans any individual or group.
You will not post or share any image or language that promotes discrimination based on race, religion, sex, nationality, disability, sexual orientation or age.
You will not post or share any image or language that violates the legal rights (including the rights of publicity and privacy) of others or contains any material that could give rise to any civil or criminal liability under applicable laws or regulations or that otherwise may be in conflict with these Terms and our Privacy Policy.
You will not attempt to circumvent any of our content-filtering techniques.
You will not post or share anything inappropriate or disruptive to the Services.
You will not disrupt, negatively affect or inhibit users from having a positive experience with the Services.
You will not use the Services in violation of these Terms and/or for any unlawful purposes.
You will not post or share anything contrary to our public image, goodwill or reputation.
This list of prohibitions provides examples and is not exhaustive or exclusive. Yik Yak reserves the right to (a) suspend or terminate access and your ability to post to the Services (or otherwise use the Services), (b) delete, remove or refuse to distribute any Submissions, all with or without cause and with or without notice, for any reason or no reason without liability to you. If Yik Yak believes a Submission violates these Terms, it may make that Submission invisible to other users without notifying you. Your Submission will be visible to you,but will not appear for any other user. Yik Yak may report to law enforcement authorities any actions that may be illegal, and any reports it receives of such conduct.  When legally required or at Yik Yak’s discretion, Yik Yak will cooperate with law enforcement agencies in any investigation of alleged illegal activity on the Services or on the Internet.  To the extent the law allows, we reserve the right to reveal your identity or any other information we know about you if a complaint or legal action arises from your Submission.
Unauthorized use of any Materials or Third-Party Content contained in the Services may violate certain laws and regulations. You agree to indemnify and hold us and our parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates, and our and their respective officers, directors, members, shareholders, employees, contractors, consultants, agents, representatives, licensors, suppliers, service providers, successors and assigns (collectively, the “Indemnified Entities”) harmless from and against any and all costs, damages, liabilities, and expenses (including attorneys’ fees and costs of defense) Yik Yak or any other Indemnified Entity suffers in relation to, arising from, or for the purpose of avoiding, any claim or demand from a third party that your use of the Services or the use of the Services by any person using your phone number or email account to register and/or your password violates any applicable law or regulation, or the copyrights, trademark rights or other rights of any third party.
Our Services offer public forums and other interactive communications.  Please be aware that these features are public or may be subject to public access.  You acknowledge that public forums offered on the Services are for public and not private communications.  Please use respect when you interact with others through our Services.  You are responsible for the content you post and the consequences of posting the content and your interactions with third parties through our Services.  Such dealings are solely between you and such third parties.  We urge you to be cautious about these interactions.  Your use or reliance on such content is at your own risk, and we are not responsible for it.  We reserve the right to remove without notice any posting or communication for any reason, but we have no obligation to delete content that you may find objectionable or offensive.  Information and opinions expressed in public forums or other interactive communications by others are not necessarily ours.
Our Services may include content posted or uploaded by third parties (“Third-Party Content”).  Unless our Services make clear otherwise, we do not claim ownership of Third-Party Content and it does not necessarily express our views.  Because it is not content we have posted or uploaded, we are not responsible for Third-Party Content and cannot verify its accuracy, timeliness, completeness or usefulness.  We have the right, but not the obligation, to monitor, edit or delete Third-Party Content.  Your use or reliance on Third-Party Content is at your own risk, and we are not responsible for it.
If you have a dispute with any other user of our Services or any third party, you agree that the dispute is between you and the third party and we are under no obligation to become involved, and you release us and our parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, members, officers, directors, shareholders, employees, consultants, affiliates, agents, representatives, service providers, licensors, successors, assigns, licensors, and business partners from claims demands, and damages of every kind or nature arising out of, relating to, or in any way connected to such dispute.
Our Services may use third-party trademarks and logos to identify third parties and resources.  Our use of these marks does not imply affiliation with or endorsement of the third party.  These marks are the property of their respective owners.
You may experience links to third-party materials or other access to other sites that are not owned, controlled or even in relationship with Yik Yak. Yik Yak has no control over such sites and resources and Yik Yak is not responsible for and does not endorse such sites and resources. You further acknowledge and agree that Yik Yak will not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or reliance on any content, events, goods or services available on or through any such site or resource. Yik Yak has no liability for any loss or claim for use of any third-party website, service, or content while using the Service. If an advertiser were to promote a service or good on Yik Yak, your relationship is solely between you and the advertiser. Yik Yak is not responsible for any loss or damages from a relationship with the advertiser.
We will do our best to provide uninterrupted access to our Services, but we do not guarantee continuous and uninterrupted access to our Services, and operation of our Services may be affected by circumstances outside of our control.  You are responsible for providing or obtaining Internet access and any hardware or software necessary to connect to the Internet or use our Site.
Your access or use of our Services through a mobile device will require wireless service and may require software.  Our Services may offer text-messaging capability. You are responsible for these requirements, all applicable charges and fees incurred from them, and the terms of your agreements with your mobile service and telecommunications providers.   Not all features of our Services may work with or be permitted by your device or network provider.  We are not responsible for the unavailability or delays in wireless, text-messaging, or telecommunications service, or any loss, damage or security breach or disclosure of your information to third parties from use of such services.
If you or we are prevented from performing or are unable to perform any obligation under these Terms due to any cause beyond the reasonable control of the party invoking this provision, the affected party’s performance will be extended for the period of delay or inability to perform due to such occurrence, but in no event later than 60 days.
The content on our Services is provided for general informational and entertainment purposes only and should not be construed as advice.  We do not warrant the accuracy, completeness or usefulness or this information.  The content is not intended to, and does not, constitute spiritual, legal, medicinal, financial or professional advice, and may not be used for such purposes.  Any reliance you place on such information is strictly at your own risk.
YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT USE OF OUR SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK, ANY MATERIAL OR DATA DOWNLOADED OR OTHERWISE OBTAINED THROUGH THE USE OF OUR SERVICES IS AT YOUR OWN DISCRETION AND RISK AND YOU WILL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY DAMAGE TO YOUR COMPUTER SYSTEM OR LOSS OF DATA THAT RESULTS FROM THE DOWNLOAD OF SUCH MATERIAL OR DATA.  OUR SERVICES AND THE MATERIALS ARE PROVIDED ON AN “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE” BASIS.  THE MATERIALS MAY NOT HAVE BEEN VERIFIED OR AUTHENTICATED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY YIK YAK, AND THEY MAY INCLUDE INACCURACIES OR TYPOGRAPHICAL OR OTHER ERRORS. YIK YAK DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS OR TIMELINESS OF THE SERVICES OR THE MATERIALS. YIK YAK HAS NO LIABILITY FOR ANY LOSS OF, OR ERRORS OR OMISSIONS IN SUBMISSIONS, OR FOR ANY ERRORS OR OMISSIONS IN THE MATERIALS OR ANY OTHER PORTION OF THE SERVICES, WHETHER PROVIDED BY YIK YAK, OUR LICENSORS OR SUPPLIERS OR OTHER USERS.  TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, WE MAKE NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, REGARDING THE USE OR THE RESULTS OF OUR SERVICES IN TERMS OF CORRECTNESS, ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, OR OTHERWISE.  WE ARE NOT LIABLE FOR ANY INTERRUPTIONS, ERRORS, COMPUTER VIRUSES, SPYWARE, OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS IN THE USE OF OUR SERVICES.  WE DISCLAIM ALL EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES WITH REGARD TO THE SERVICES AND THE MATERIALS, INCLUDING THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, TITLE, FREEDOM FROM DEFECTS, UNINTERRUPTED USE, AND ALL WARRANTIES IMPLIED FROM ANY COURSE OF DEALING OR USAGE OF TRADE.  THIS INCLUDES LOSS OF DATA OR PROFIT ARISING OUT OF THE USE OR THE INABILITY TO USE THE SERVICES.  WE DO NOT WARRANT THAT ANY CONTENT OR INFORMATION ACCESSED THROUGH OUR SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED OR ERROR FREE, DEFECTS WILL BE CORRECTED, OR OUR SITE OR THE SERVERS THAT MAKE OUR SITE AVAILABLE ARE FREE OF VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS.
IN NO EVENT WILL WE OR ANY OF OUR PARENTS, SUBSIDIARIES, OR AFFILIATES, OR THEIR OR OUR RESPECTIVE OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, MEMBERS, SHAREHOLDERS, EMPLOYEES, CONTRACTORS, CONSULTANTS, AGENTS, REPRESENTATIVES, LICENSORS, SUPPLIERS, SERVICE PROVIDERS, SUCCESSORS OR ASSIGNS BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY FOR ANY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING DIRECT, INDIRECT, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, EXEMPLARY OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES, OR DAMAGES FOR LOST PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, OR LOSS OF USE, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO ANY USE OF OUR SERVICES OR THE INFORMATION CONTAINED ON OUR SERVICES, THE USE OF OR THE INABILITY TO USE OUR SERVICES, OR ANY GOODS OR SERVICES PURCHASED OR OBTAINED OR MESSAGES RECEIVED OR TRANSACTIONS ENTERED INTO THROUGH OUR SERVICES, OR LOSS OF, UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR ALTERATION OF A USER’S TRANSMISSIONS OR DATA OR FOR THE COST OF PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS AND SERVICES, WHETHER SUCH DAMAGES ARISE IN CONTRACT, NEGLIGENCE, TORT, STRICT LIABILITY, UNDER STATUTE, IN EQUITY, AT LAW, OR OTHERWISE, EVEN IF WE OR OUR REPRESENTATIVES HAVE BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.  IN NO EVENT WILL OUR TOTAL LIABILITY TO YOU FOR ALL DAMAGES, LOSSES, OR CAUSES OF ACTION EXCEED THE GREATER OF THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY YOU FOR THE SERVICES GIVING RISE TO THE CAUSE OF ACTION OR ONE DOLLAR ($1.00).  SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW FOR THE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION OF LIABILITY FOR INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES.  IN THOSE JURISDICTIONS, OUR LIABILITY IS LIMITED TO THE GREATEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW.
BY USING OUR SERVICES, YOU WAIVE ANY RIGHTS YOU MAY HAVE WITH RESPECT TO CALIFORNIA CIVIL CODE SECTION 1542, WHICH SAYS “A GENERAL RELEASE DOES NOT EXTEND TO CLAIMS WHICH THE CREDITOR DOES NOT KNOW OR SUSPECT TO EXIST IN HIS FAVOR AT THE TIME OF EXECUTING THE RELEASE, WHICH, IF KNOWN BY HIM MUST HAVE MATERIALLY AFFECTED HIS SETTLEMENT WITH THE DEBTOR,” AND ANY SIMILAR LAW OF ANY OTHER JURISDICTION.
The Services may contain advertisements. In consideration for Yik Yak letting you access and use the Services, you agree that, subject to our Privacy Policy, we, our affiliates, and our third-party partners may place advertising on the Services. Because the Services contain content that you and other users provide to us, advertising may sometimes appear near your content.
Yik Yak controls and operates the Services from its headquarters in the United States and the Services may not be appropriate or available for use in other locations. You are responsible for following applicable laws and regulations in your jurisdiction, including but not limited to laws and regulations regarding the transmission of technical data exported from the United States or the country in which you reside.
We prohibit accessing content from within jurisdictions where such content is illegal.  If you choose to access our Services from outside the United States, you do so on your own initiative and are solely responsible for complying with applicable local laws, including applicable laws regarding the transmission of data exported from the United States or the country in which you reside.  Certain software and services offered on or through our Services may be subject to United States export controls and economic sanctions laws. In particular, but without limitation, software and software services through our Services may not be exported to any U.S. embargoed countries or anyone on the U.S. Treasury Department’s list of Specifically Designated Nationals or the U.S. Department of Commerce Denied Person’s List or Entity List.
If you send or transmit any communications, comments, questions, suggestions, or related materials regarding Yik Yak or the Services, whether by email or otherwise (collectively, “Feedback”), such Feedback is, and will be treated as, non-confidential and non-proprietary. You hereby assign all right, title, and interest in, and Yik Yak is free to use, without any attribution or compensation to you, any and all Feedback for any purpose whatsoever. You understand and agree that Yik Yak is not obligated to use, display, reproduce, or distribute any such ideas, know-how, concepts, or techniques contained in the Feedback, and you have no right to compel such use, display, reproduction, or distribution.
If you offer any comments or suggestions about the Service, you agree that your disclosure is gratuitous, was not requested and without restriction and will not place Yik Yak under any fiduciary or other obligation, and that Yik Yak has the ability to use your suggestion for other purposes, and/or to share the idea to anyone without confidentiality. If Yik Yak were to receive your suggestion or idea, Yik Yak still has rights to ideas similar to your suggestion or conceived from sources besides you.
Please read the following provision (the “Provision”) carefully; it requires you to arbitrate disputes with Yik Yak and otherwise limits the ways you can seek remedies from us.
Many customer concerns can be resolved quickly and to a customer’s satisfaction by contacting us at
hello@yikyak.com
. We ask that you please contact us if you have any concerns.
This Provision facilitates the prompt and efficient resolution of any disputes that may arise between you and Yik Yak. Arbitration is a form of private dispute resolution in which persons with a dispute waive their rights to file a lawsuit, to proceed in court and to a jury trial, and instead submit their disputes to a neutral third person (or arbitrator) for a binding decision. You have the right to opt out of this Provision (as explained below), which means you would retain your right to litigate your disputes in a court, either before a judge or a jury.
This Provision provides that all Disputes between you and Yik Yak shall be resolved by binding arbitration. Arbitration replaces the right to go to court. In the absence of this arbitration agreement, you may otherwise have a right or opportunity to bring claims in a court, before a judge or jury, and/or to participate in or be represented in a case filed in court by others (including, but not limited to, class actions). Except as otherwise provided, entering into this agreement constitutes a waiver of your right to litigate claims and all opportunity to be heard by a judge or jury. There is no judge or jury in arbitration, and court review of an arbitration award is limited. The arbitrator must follow this agreement and can award the same damages and relief as a court (including attorney’s fees).
For the purpose of this Provision, “Yik Yak” means Yik Yak and its parents, subsidiary, and affiliate companies, and each of their respective officers, directors, employees, contractors and agents. The term “Dispute” means any dispute, claim, or controversy between you and Yik Yak regarding any aspect of your relationship with Yik Yak, whether based in contract, statute, regulation, ordinance, tort (including, but not limited to, fraud, misrepresentation, fraudulent inducement, or negligence), or any other legal or equitable theory, and includes the validity, enforceability or scope of this Provision (with the exception of the enforceability of the Class Action Waiver clause below). “Dispute” is to be given the broadest possible meaning that will be enforced, and shall include any claims against other parties relating to services or products provided or billed to you (such as Yik Yak’s licensors, suppliers, dealers or third-party vendors) whenever you also assert claims against us in the same proceeding.
WE EACH AGREE THAT, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BELOW, ANY AND ALL DISPUTES, AS DEFINED ABOVE, WHETHER PRESENTLY IN EXISTENCE OR BASED ON ACTS OR OMISSIONS IN THE PAST OR IN THE FUTURE, WILL BE RESOLVED EXCLUSIVELY AND FINALLY BY BINDING ARBITRATION RATHER THAN IN COURT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PROVISION.
For all Disputes, whether pursued in court or arbitration, you must first give Yik Yak an opportunity to resolve the Dispute. You must commence this process by mailing written notification to Yik Yak Inc., 306 S. Washington Ave., Suite 400, Royal Oak, MI 48067. That written notification must include (1) your name, (2) your address, (3) a written description of your Claim, and (4) a description of the specific relief you seek. If Yik Yak does not resolve the Dispute within 45 days after it receives your written notification, you may pursue your Dispute in arbitration. You may pursue your Dispute in a court only under the circumstances described below.
Notwithstanding the above, you or Yik Yak may choose to pursue a Dispute in court and not by arbitration if (a) given the nature and amount of the Dispute, it may be initiated in small claims court; or (b) YOU OPT-OUT OF THESE ARBITRATION PROCEDURES WITHIN 30 DAYS FROM THE DATE THAT YOU FIRST CONSENT TO THIS AGREEMENT (the “Opt-Out Deadline”). You may opt out of this Provision by mailing written notification to Yik Yak Inc., 306 S. Washington Ave., Suite 400, Royal Oak, MI 48067. Your written notification must include (1) your name, (2) your address, and (3) a clear statement that you do not wish to resolve disputes with Yik Yak through arbitration. Your decision to opt out of this Arbitration Provision will have no adverse effect on your relationship with Yik Yak.
Any opt-out request received after the Opt-Out Deadline will not be valid and you must pursue your Dispute in arbitration or small claims court.
Arbitration Organization: If this Provision applies and the Dispute is not resolved as provided above (Pre-Arbitration Claim Resolution) either you or Yik Yak may initiate arbitration proceedings. The American Arbitration Association (“AAA”),
http://www.adr.org/
, or JAMS,
http://www.jamsadr.com/
, will arbitrate all Disputes, and the arbitration will be conducted before a single arbitrator. The arbitration shall be commenced as an individual arbitration and shall in no event be commenced as a class arbitration. All issues shall be for the arbitrator to decide, including the scope of this Provision.
For arbitration before AAA, for Disputes of less than $75,000, the AAA’s Supplementary Procedures for Consumer-Related Disputes will apply; for Disputes involving $75,000 or more, the AAA’s Commercial Arbitration Rules will apply. In either instance, the AAA’s Optional Rules for Emergency Measures of Protection shall apply. The AAA rules are available at
www.adr.org
or by calling 1-800-778-7879. For arbitration before JAMS, the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules & Procedures and the JAMS Recommended Arbitration Discovery Protocols for Domestic, Commercial Cases will apply. The JAMS rules are available at
http://www.jamsadr.com/
or by calling 1-800-352-5267. This Provision governs in the event it conflicts with the applicable arbitration rules. Under no circumstances will class action procedures or rules apply to the arbitration.
Because the Services and these Terms concern interstate commerce, the Federal Arbitration Act (“FAA”) governs the arbitrability of all Disputes. However, the arbitrator will apply applicable substantive law consistent with the FAA and the applicable statute of limitations or condition precedent to suit.
Arbitration Award: The arbitrator may award on an individual basis any relief that would be available pursuant to applicable law and will not have the power to award relief to, against or for the benefit of any person who is not a party to the proceeding. The arbitrator will make any award in writing but need not provide a statement of reasons unless requested by a party. Such award will be final and binding on the parties, except for any right of appeal provided by the FAA, and may be entered in any court having jurisdiction over the parties for purposes of enforcement.
Location of Arbitration: You or Yik Yak may initiate arbitration in either Nashville, Tennessee or the federal judicial district that includes your billing address. In the event that you select the federal judicial district that includes your billing address, Yik Yak may transfer the arbitration to Nashville, Tennessee, in the event that it agrees to pay any additional fees or costs you incur as a result of the transfer, as determined by the arbitrator.
Payment of Arbitration Fees and Costs: Yik Yak will pay all arbitration filing fees and arbitrator’s costs and expenses upon your written request given prior to the commencement of the arbitration. You are responsible for all additional fees and costs that you incur in the arbitration, including, but not limited to, attorneys or expert witnesses. Fees and costs may be awarded as provided pursuant to applicable law. In addition to any rights to recover fees and costs under applicable law, if you provide notice and negotiate in good faith with Yik Yak as provided in the section above titled “Pre-Arbitration Claim Resolution” and the arbitrator concludes that you are the prevailing party in the arbitration, you will be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs as determined by the arbitrator.
Except as otherwise provided in this Provision, the arbitrator may not consolidate more than one person’s claims and may not otherwise preside over any form of a class or representative proceeding or claims (such as a class action, consolidated action or private attorney general action) unless both you and Yik Yak specifically agree to do so following initiation of the arbitration.
If you choose to pursue your Dispute in court by opting out of the Arbitration Provision, as specified above, this Class Action Waiver will not apply to you.
Neither you, nor any other user of the Services can be a class representative, class member, or otherwise participate in a class, consolidated, or representative proceeding without having complied with the opt-out requirements above.
You understand and agree that by entering into this Agreement you and Yik Yak are each waiving the right to a jury trial or a trial before a judge in a public court. In the absence of this Provision, you and Yik Yak might otherwise have had a right or opportunity to bring Disputes in a court, before a judge or jury, and/or to participate or be represented in a case filed in court by others (including class actions). Except as otherwise provided in this Provision, those rights are waived. Other rights that you would have if you went to court, such as the right to appeal and to certain types of discovery, may be more limited or may also be waived.
If any clause within this Provision (other than the Class Action Waiver clause above) is found to be illegal or unenforceable, that clause will be severed from this Provision, and the remainder of this Provision will be given full force and effect. If the Class Action Waiver clause is found to be illegal or unenforceable, this entire Provision will be unenforceable and the Dispute will be decided by a court.
This Provision shall survive the termination of your service with Yik Yak or its affiliates. Notwithstanding any provision in this Agreement to the contrary, we agree that if Yik Yak makes any change to this Provision (other than a change to the Notice Address), you may reject any such change and require Yik Yak to adhere to the language in this Provision if a Dispute arises.
Yik Yak respects the intellectual property rights of others. If you have a good-faith belief that your intellectual property appears on the Services in violation of your copyright, please provide Yik Yak’s designated copyright agent listed below the following information:
A physical or electronic signature of a person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is allegedly infringed.
Identification of the work claimed to have been infringed, or, if multiple works at a single online site are covered by a single notification, a representative list of such works at that site.
Identification of the material that is claimed to be infringing or to be the subject of infringing activity and that is to be removed or access to which is to be disabled at the Services, and information reasonably sufficient to permit Yik Yak to locate the material.
Information reasonably sufficient to permit Yik Yak to contact you as the complaining party, including an address, telephone number, and, if available, an electronic mail address at which you may be contacted.
A statement that you have a good faith belief that use of the material in the manner complained of is not authorized by the intellectual property owner, its agent, or the law.
A statement that the information in the notification is accurate, and under penalty of perjury, that you are authorized to act on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is allegedly infringed.
Yik Yak’s agent for notice of claims of intellectual property infringement on the Services can be reached as follows:
Yik Yak
Attn: Copyright Agent
hello@yikyak.com
28475 Greenfield Road
Suite 113 #7226
Southfield, MI 48076
615-200-7392
Please be advised that if you materially misrepresent that material is infringing your intellectual property, you may be liable for damages (including costs and attorneys’ fees).  If you are not sure whether the material infringes on your intellectual property, you should consider contacting an attorney before contacting us.
We will notify you that we have removed or disabled access to copyright-protected material that you provided, if such removal is pursuant to a valid take-down notice that we have received in accordance with the requirements set forth above. If you receive such notice from us, you may provide us with a counter-notification in writing to Yik Yak’s designated agent that includes all of the following information:
Your physical or electronic signature;
Identification of the material that has been removed or to which access has been disabled, and the location at which the material appeared before it was removed or access to it was disabled;
A statement from you under the penalty of perjury, that you have a good faith belief that the material was removed or disabled as a result of a mistake or misidentification; and
Your name, physical address and telephone number, and a statement that you consent to the jurisdiction of a court for the judicial district in which your physical address is located, or if your physical address is outside of the United States, for any judicial district in which Yik Yak may be located, and that you will accept service of process from the person who provided notification of allegedly infringing material or an agent of such person.
PLEASE NOTE THAT INFORMATION PROVIDED IN THIS LEGAL NOTICE MAY BE FORWARDED TO THE PERSON WHO PROVIDED THE ALLEGEDLY INFRINGING CONTENT. UNDER FEDERAL LAW, IF YOU KNOWINGLY MISREPRESENT THAT ONLINE MATERIAL IS INFRINGING, YOU MAY BE SUBJECT TO CRIMINAL PROSECUTION FOR PERJURY AND CIVIL PENALTIES, INCLUDING MONETARY DAMAGES, COURT COSTS, AND ATTORNEYS’ FEES. YIK YAK TAKES NO RESPONSIBILITY AND ASSUMES NO LIABILITY FOR ANY CONTENT THAT YOU OR ANY OTHER USER OR THIRD PARTY BROADCASTS OR SENDS THROUGH THE SERVICES. YOU SHALL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR YOUR CONTENT AND THE CONSEQUENCES OF POSTING OR PUBLISHING IT, AND YOU AGREE THAT WE ARE ONLY ACTING AS A CONDUIT FOR YOUR ONLINE BROADCAST AND PUBLICATION OF YOUR CONTENT. PLEASE NOTE THAT THIS PROCEDURE IS EXCLUSIVELY FOR NOTIFYING YIK YAK AND ITS AFFILIATES THAT YOUR COPYRIGHTED MATERIAL HAS BEEN INFRINGED. THE PRECEDING REQUIREMENTS ARE INTENDED TO COMPLY WITH YIK YAK’S RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE DIGITAL MILLENNIUM COPYRIGHT ACT (“DMCA”), INCLUDING 17 U.S.C. §512(C), BUT DO NOT CONSTITUTE LEGAL ADVICE. IT MAY BE ADVISABLE TO CONTACT AN ATTORNEY REGARDING YOUR RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE DMCA AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS. IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE DMCA AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS, YIK YAK HAS ADOPTED A POLICY OF TERMINATING, IN APPROPRIATE CIRCUMSTANCES, THE ACCOUNTS OF USERS WHO ARE DEEMED TO BE REPEAT INFRINGERS. YIK YAK MAY ALSO, AT ITS SOLE DISCRETION, LIMIT ACCESS TO THE SERVICES AND/OR TERMINATE THE ACCOUNTS OF ANY INFRINGERS OF THE INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS OF OTHERS, WHETHER OR NOT THERE IS ANY REPEAT INFRINGEMENT.
You are responsible for all taxes, duties, levies, and fees, including any sales, use or withholding taxes, imposed on or in connection with use of our Services by any taxing authority worldwide.
You acknowledge that no joint venture, partnership, employment, or agency relationship exists between you and us as a result of these Terms or any use of the Services.  You agree not to hold yourself out as our representative, agent, or employee, and we shall not be liable for any representation, act or omission made by you.
You agree to defend, indemnify and hold harmless us, our parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates, and their and our respective officers, directors, members, shareholders, employees, contractors, consultants, agents, representatives, licensors, suppliers, service providers, successors and assigns from and against any claims, liabilities, damages, judgments, awards, losses, costs, expenses or fees (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) arising out of or relating to your violation of these Terms or your representations and warranties in these Terms, your use of the Services, including, without limitation, your Submissions, any use of the Site’s or App’s content, services and products other than as expressly authorized in these Terms or your use of any information obtained from the Site or App, or infringed by you, or other use of the Site or App using your computer, of any intellectual property or any other right or any person or entity.  You will cooperate as fully as reasonably required in the defense of any claim.  We reserve the right, at our expense, to assume the exclusive defense and control of any matter otherwise subject to indemnification by you, and you will not in any event settle any such matter without our written consent.
The Federal Arbitration Act, Tennessee state law and applicable U.S. federal law, without regard to the choice or conflicts of law provisions, will govern these Terms. Foreign laws do not apply. The United Nations on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods and any laws based on the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act (UCITA) shall not apply to this Agreement. Except for Disputes subject to arbitration as described above, any disputes relating to these Terms or the Services or the use of the Services by you will be heard in the courts located in Nashville, Davidson County, Tennessee. By using the Services, and thereby agreeing to these Terms, you consent to personal jurisdiction and venue in the state and federal courts in Nashville, Davidson County, Tennessee, with respect to all such disputes.  You acknowledge that your breach or potential breach of any of these Terms or infringement or potential infringement of our intellectual property rights may cause us irreparable harm for which recovery of money damages would be inadequate.  You agree that we will be entitled, in addition to any other remedies available to us, to seek any relief, equitable or otherwise, to prevent or restrain such breach or potential breach.These Terms are the entire agreement between you and Yik Yak and supersede all prior or contemporaneous negotiations, discussions or agreements between you and Yik Yak about the Services.
These Terms will inure to the benefit of our successors, assigns and licensees.  If any provisions of these Terms are unlawful, void, or unenforceable for any reason, the other provisions will not be affected and will remain valid and enforceable to the maximum possible extent.  These Terms will apply in addition to, and will not be superseded by, any other written agreement between you and us in relation to any of the Services.  Our failure to insist on or enforce strict performance of any provision of these Terms will not be construed as a waiver of any provision or right.  Our
Privacy Policy
and
Cookies Policy
are binding parts of our Terms, and together with these Terms and any other specific terms or agreements in connection with a particular feature of or through the Services constitute the entire agreement between you and us with respect to your use of the Services.  Any cause of action you may have with respect to your use of our Services or that is the subject of these Terms must be commenced within one (1) year after the claim or cause of action arises. Any provisions of these Terms that by their nature should survive termination of these Terms, including without limitation the proprietary rights, disclaimer of warranties, representations made by you, indemnities, limitations of liability and general provisions, will survive.
If you have any questions about these Terms or otherwise need to contact Yik Yak for any reason, you can reach us at:
Yik Yak, Inc.
hello@yikyak.com
28475 Greenfield Road
Suite 113 #7226
Southfield, MI 48076
615-200-7392
Last updated: January 24, 2023
Yik Yak Inc. (“Yik Yak,” “we” and “us”) believes privacy is incredibly important and pledges to respect and protect its users.
The Yik Yak application (the “App”) is made available as a mobile application, and information regarding the application is available on Yik Yak’s website located at
www.yikyak.com
.  The Yik Yak application, website, and related services will be referred to as the “Services.”  The App offers users a forum to interact with other Yik Yak users in the same geographic area. In this Privacy Policy (“Policy”), we describe how we collect, use, and disclose information that we obtain about users of the Services.
We ask that you read the Policy in order to understand how your information is being used. When you use the Services, you are consenting to this Policy.  If you do not agree with content in the Policy, you must stop using the Services.
Personal Information We Collect Automatically
. Personal information is information that identifies or is capable of identifying you as an individual.  We collect personal information from you when you voluntarily provide it to us.
In order to use the App, you must register with your phone number.  When you post a Yak, we collect the time the Yak was posted, the location the Yak was posted from, and the Yak content.
We may automatically collect information about your use of the Services such as: access/log-in and log-out time, IP address, device ID, application ID or other unique identifier; domain name, screen views; geo-location data (with your permission); language information; device name and model; operating system information, browser type and language and version of the browser software; your activities within the Services; and the length of time that you are logged in. We may combine this information with other information that we have collected about you. Such data is collected, as without such data the Services cannot be accessed.
If you choose not to share your location information, the Services will not function. Location information is used to place you in your local / home Yik Yak group, to enable you to find and connect with local Yakkers, and to enable local Yakkers to find and connect with you. You can revoke your consent by changing the settings or preferences on your device or by deleting Yik Yak from your device.
Telephone Number
.
We ask you to provide and verify your phone number via a verification code texted to your phone when you first launch the App. Your phone number must be verified in order to view content, post content or access the Services.
Your Content and Usage
.
We may collect content you submit to the Services, information about the content, such as when you submitted it, and any metadata that is provided with the content.
Other Information you Provide to Us
.
When you interact with the Services or otherwise communicate with Yik Yak in any way, we may collect the information you choose to share with us.
Social Media Sites
.
You can like us on Facebook, follow us on Twitter and Instagram, and promote us on other social media sites. We collect information about who has liked us or followed us. You may also share Yaks through Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, and other social media accounts.
Aggregate and Anonymous Information
.  Sometimes we use aggregate or anonymous information.  Anonymous information is data where all information that enabled you to be identified has been removed.  Aggregated information is anonymous data collected about a group of users or other categories.  Your personal information is not included in aggregate or anonymous data.  We may use this type of information, for example, to help us understand trends and your needs and preferences and to improve our services.  This policy does not restrict our use of aggregate and anonymous information.
In general, we use the information we collect from and about you to provide and operate the Services, respond to your requests, and provide customer service and technical support. Due to your use of the App or communication with Yik Yak, some of the information we collect may personally identify you. The personally identifiable information you may submit during your use of the App could include phone number and geographic location.  We will not ask for other identifying information from you but you may voluntarily provide it to us in communications with us such as email queries in which you voluntarily provide your email address.
Other data that could be collected from your use of Yik Yak is not considered personally identifiable information, except if that information is combined with personally identifiable information or unless otherwise required by applicable law. We may also use information:
To place you in your local Yik Yak group so that you can post and review content based on your current location.
To enable you to find and connect with users in your proximity i.e. local Yakkers and for them to find and connect with you.
To tag your posts with city-level location information.
To enable you to search for local Yakkers by status.
To place you in your home Yik Yak group so that you can post and review content in your community even when you are away.
To tailor the information that we send or display to you, offer location customization, and send you push notifications and alerts.
To personalize and customize your experiences while using the Services, for example, by giving you more content from sources you have up-voted, showing you less content from sources you have down-voted or adjusting the ranking of Yaks based on your preferences.
To send you notices.
To display advertising, including advertising that is targeted to you based on your location and your Yik Yak activities.
To verify your identity and prevent impersonation, spam or other unauthorized or illegal activity or activity that violates our Terms of Use.
To comply with laws, regulations, and other legal requirements.
To comply with relevant industry standards and our policies.
To protect and enforce our rights arising under any agreements entered into between you and us.
To protect the integrity and maintain the security of the App, including secured areas of the App.
To better understand how users access and use the Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis, in order to improve the Services and respond to user desires and preferences, and for other research and analytical purposes.
Yik Yak is based in the United States. No matter where you are located, please be advised that you are transferring your personal information to us in the United States, and by using our Services, you consent to that transfer and use of your personal information in accordance with this Policy. If you are a user outside of the United States, please know that any information you provide on our Services may be transferred to the United States, which does not offer an equivalent level of protection to that required in certain other countries.  Some local privacy laws may require us to obtain your consent before we transfer your information from your originating country to other countries.  When you agree to this Policy, you are, to the extent required and permitted under your local law, granting your consent to the transfer of your personal information to such other countries for the purposes described in this Policy.  These countries may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you initially provided the information.  We take steps to ensure that it is adequately protected in compliance with applicable laws, including ensuring appropriate security measures are in place and requiring the third parties to protect your personal information in accordance with this Policy, or obtaining your consent where required.  You also agree to abide by applicable law concerning your use of the Services and your agreements with us. Any persons accessing the Services from any jurisdiction with laws or regulations governing the use of the Internet, including personal data collection, use and disclosure, different from those of the jurisdictions mentioned above may only use the Services in a manner lawful in their jurisdiction. If your use of the Services would be unlawful in your jurisdiction, you may not use the Services, and your information may be made available in response to government or law enforcement requests.
You cannot control who views the content you post on a Yik Yak feed, as it is publicly available. So, if you don’t want to share something publicly, don’t post it.
The information we collect, including personally identifiable information, may be shared as follows:
Yik Yak Users
.
Any information that you (i) post (i.e. Yaks), (ii) link to (for example, your Facebook account), or (iii) send (for example, chats) may be shared with other users and potentially the public at large, depending on the type of feature you are using. For example, any posts on a Yik Yak feed are available to all other users and may be publicly distributed, and any status you post can be used to search for users with that “type” of status (i.e. studyingForExams, watchingFootball). Users can freely save or re-share any Yik Yak content on and off the Services.
Please don’t post content or send messages you wouldn’t want others to save or share.
Service Providers
. We may disclose the information we collect to third-party vendors, service providers, contractors or agents who perform functions on our behalf. When we do so, we require those third parties to protect your personal information in accordance with this Policy and applicable laws.
Business Transfers
. We may transfer the information we have collected to another company in connection with, or during negotiations of, any dissolution, bankruptcy or similar event, merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of the business.
Third Parties and Partners
.
Subject to our legal obligations with respect to your personal information, we may share the information with our third-party partners, including advertisers and researchers. For example, if you post content that mentions one of our advertisers, we may share that content with them. Or, we may work with a researcher to analyze the content on a particular feed. Once you leave our Services and are directed to another site or application, however, this Policy and our Terms of Use no longer apply and the terms and policies on such third-party site apply.
In Response to Legal Process
. We may disclose the information in order to comply with the law, a judicial proceeding, court order, subpoena, or other legal process. For example, we may share your phone number or other identifier, your location information, or any other information we have collected about you and your device.
To Protect Us and Others
. We also may disclose information if we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our Terms of Service or this Policy, or as evidence in litigation in which Yik Yak is involved.
Aggregate and De-Identified Information
. We may also share aggregate or de-identified information about users with third parties for marketing, advertising, research or similar purposes, as described further below.
You can choose to “Share Yik Yak” by inviting contacts via email, text or other means. You choose what contacts to invite and when to invite them. If you invite a contact, we will generate a message with the Yik Yak download URL included, which you can choose to send via your mobile device.
You can delete content you have posted on a Yik Yak feed (including replies). Content you delete from a Yik Yak feed will be hidden from other users. However, Yik Yak may maintain a copy of your content in our records, subject to applicable law and this Policy.
You may change your privacy settings at any time by contacting us at
hello@yikyak.com
.  You may indicate your options to:
Modify, update, and delete your user account;
Opt in or opt out of subscriptions to newsletters, mailings, and other communications and alerts, to the extent we offer any;
Opt in or out of receiving offers and promotions; and
Opt in or opt out of sharing your personal information with others so they can send you offers and promotions.
You may contact us to request a copy of the information we have collected about you, request to correct or update any information we have about you, or request deletion of your account or personal information.  Following a request for deletion, we will delete your information unless required to retain it by applicable laws.  We may also retain certain of your information if necessary for safety or security, fraud prevention, quality assurance, or other legitimate business interests, and only in accordance with applicable laws.
You may withdraw any consent you have granted to our collection and use of your personal information at any time, subject to our right to continue to use your personal information as permitted or required under applicable laws.  Such withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of our collection or use of your personal information prior to withdrawal.
Because there is not yet a consensus on how companies should respond to web-browser-based do-not-track mechanisms, we do not respond to do-not-track signals at this time.
We retain your information only as long as necessary to provide our services to you, enhance your user experience, and otherwise as necessary for our operations or as permitted or required by applicable laws.
We may send push notifications or alerts to your device. You can deactivate these messages at any time by changing the notification settings on your device or by changing your Yik Yak settings.
Yik Yak may send you information, updates or promotional offers via text message. If you indicate your desire to receive such messages, you have the ability to opt out at any time. Please note that your carrier’s text messaging and data fees apply.
The General Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR, governs privacy practices involving individuals in the European Union and the European Union and the European Economic Area and certain other transactions related to those areas.  If the GDPR applies to your personal information that we have collected, our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information will depend on the personal information concerned and the context in which it is collected, including legitimate business purposes, as necessary to provide products and services to you or respond to your inquiries and requests, with your consent, to comply with applicable laws, or when there is a legitimate and overriding interest that necessitates the use.
“Cookies” are small data file identifiers that are transferred to your computer that allow us to recognize your browser and transfer information about you and your use of the Services. For example, cookies that we use tell us how many times you have visited one of our Sites. We use “persistent” cookies and similar technologies to save your login information for future logins to the Services. We also use “session ID” cookies and similar technologies to enable certain features of the Services, to better understand how you interact with the Services and to monitor aggregate usage by users and web traffic routing on the Services. Unlike persistent cookies, session ID cookies are deleted from your computer when you log off from a Service and close your browser. You can instruct your browser, by changing its settings, to stop accepting cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie from our Sites. If you do not accept cookies, you may not be able to use all portions of the Services or all functionality of the Services.  You can read more about our use of cookies in our
Cookies Policy
.
We retain your information only as long as necessary to provide our Services to you, enhance your user experience, and otherwise as necessary for our operations or as permitted or required by applicable laws.
We may use automated devices and applications, including those offered by third parties to evaluate usage of the Services. We also may use other analytic means to evaluate our Services. We use these tools to help us improve the Services, performance and user experiences. The information collected may include unique device identifiers, device manufacturer and operating system, IP address, browser type, session start/stop time, and user activity.
To learn how Google Analytics uses your data from the Services and how to opt out of collection of your information by Google Analytics via the Services please visit
https://support.google.com/analytics/topic/2919631?hl=en&ref_topic=1008008
and
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
We may display ads to you (including in-app ads), and we may target those ads based on your location, your Yik Yak activities, and other criteria (e.g., the time of day).  For more information about interest-based ads, including how to opt out of having your web browsing information used for behavioral advertising purposes, please visit
www.aboutads.info/choices
.
Our Services may contain third-party links, including third-party integrations. Any access to and use of such links or third-party integrations is not governed by this Policy, but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third parties.  Once you leave our Services and are directed to another site or application, this Policy and our Terms of Use no longer apply and the terms and policies on such third-party site apply.  You have the choice whether to access the links to these sites, initiate the transaction or activate the features.  This Policy does not apply to any third-party linked sites, and we are not responsible for the privacy practices or the contents of such external sites.  We encourage you to consult the privacy policies of such sites before sharing any personal information through them, initiating any transactions or activating the features.
We take the security of your information seriously and go to great lengths to protect your personal information from unauthorized access, improper use or disclosure, unauthorized modification or unlawful destruction or accidental loss. We try hard to keep our Services a safe place for all users, but we can’t guarantee it. As a result, you understand that your personal information is shared with Yik Yak at your own risk.  Where required by law, we will notify you of any such loss, misuse or alteration of personal information that may affect you so you can take the appropriate actions to protect your rights.
If you believe your information has been compromised, please contact Yik Yak immediately.
Our Services are not intended for or designed to attract children under the age of 18, and we will not knowingly solicit or collect personal information from children we actually know are under 18.  If you are not 13 years old or older, please do not use the Services or provide any information to us. If we discover that a child under 13 years old has provided us with personal information, we take steps to remove such information.  If you believe a child under the age of 13 has given us personal information, please contact us so we may delete the information.
The Terms of Service and the Community Guardrails located within the App govern the use of the App including the functionality, tools, content and promotions. If any part of the Policy conflicts with specific terms of a promotion or content within the App, the terms of the specific feature will be enforced.
If you have questions about the privacy aspects of the Services or would like to make a complaint, please contact us at
Yik Yak, Inc.
hello@yikyak.com
28475 Greenfield Road
Suite 113 #7226
Southfield, MI 48076
615-200-7392
This Policy is current as of the Effective Date set forth above. We may change this Policy from time to time, so please be sure to check back periodically. We will post any changes to this Policy at
https://www.yikyak.com/privacy
. If we make any changes to this Policy that materially affect the practices with regard to the personal information we have previously collected from you, we will endeavor to provide you with notice in advance of such change by highlighting the change on the Services.
This statement of California Privacy Rights supplements our Privacy Policy and applies solely to residents of the State of California.  As a California resident, you have additional privacy rights related to your personal information under California law, including the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), as described below.  Personal information under the CCPA is any information that can identify you or your household, either directly or indirectly, such as your name, address, telephone number, and email address (“Personal Information”).  Any terms defined in the CCPA and not defined here have the same meaning when used here.
California’s “Shine the Light” law (Civil Code Section § 1798.83) permits users of our Services that are California residents to request certain information regarding our disclosure of personal information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes.  To make such a request, please contact us using the information in the “How to contact us” section below.
We collect personal information from you when you voluntarily provide it to us, such as by creating a user account, signing up for email updates, registering for events, entering contests, subscribing to newsletters, ordering products or services, or responding to surveys, offers, promotions, and other communications.  We also may collect personal information about you from your use of our products and services or through our partners and other publicly and commercially available sources.  We have collected Personal Information in the following categories marked by an “X” in the last 12 months:
X
Identifiers such as real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, social security number, driver’s license number, passport number, or other similar identifiers;
X
Financial or health information: (examples: physical characteristics or description, address, telephone number, bank account number, credit card number, debit card number, financial information, medical information, health insurance information);
___ Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law;
X
Commercial information, including records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies;
___ Biometric information;
X
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, without limitation, browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an Internet Web site, application, or advertisement;
X
Geolocation data (information that can be used to track an electronic device’s location);
___ Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information;
___ Professional or employment-related information;
___ Education information, defined as information that is not publicly available personally identifiable information as defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99).
X
Inferences drawn from any of the information identified in this subdivision to create a profile about a consumer reflecting the consumer’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
We collect your Personal Information from both you and through our partners and other publicly and commercially available sources as well as through the use of cookies.  You can read more about our use of cookies in our Privacy Policy and our
Cookies Policy
.
We use your Personal Information for the following business purposes if marked by an “X”:
___ Auditing related to a current interaction with the consumer and concurrent transactions, including, but not limited to, counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with this specification and other standards.
X
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity.
___ Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
X
Short-term, transient use, provided that the personal information is not disclosed to another third party and is not used to build a profile about a consumer or otherwise alter an individual consumer’s experience outside the current interaction, including, but not limited to, the contextual customization of ads shown as part of the same interaction.
___ Performing services on behalf of the business or service provider, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing financing, providing advertising or marketing services, providing analytic services, or providing similar services on behalf of the business or service provider.
___ Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration.
___ Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of a service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by the business, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance the service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by the business.
For all categories of Personal Information collected, we disclose such information to our service providers and other third parties to help us accomplish the business purposes described above and as further outlined in our Privacy Policy.
As a California resident, you have the right to request certain information regarding our use of your Personal Information, including the following:
The different categories of Personal Information we have collected about you during the last 12 months and the categories of sources from which that information was collected;
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling your Personal Information;
The categories of third parties with whom we shared your Personal Information;
Whether we have disclosed or sold your Personal Information to a third party for a business or commercial purpose during the last 12 months and the categories of the Personal Information disclosed or sold; and
The specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you.
To submit a request for Personal Information, you must submit a Verifiable Consumer Request following the procedures described in the Verifiable Consumer Request Procedures section below. You may submit a Personal Information request up to twice during a 12-month period.
As a California resident, you have the right to request that we not sell your Personal Information.  Please note that we do not, and will not, sell your Personal Information to third parties.
As a California resident, you have a limited right to request that we and all of our service providers delete your Personal Information.  You must do so by submitting a Verifiable Consumer Request to delete your Personal Information following the procedures described in the Verifiable Consumer Request Procedures section below.  Upon receipt and confirmation of the Verifiable Consumer Request, we will delete your Personal Information from our systems and direct our service providers to do the same at no cost to you.  There are exceptions to this right.  We may retain your Personal Information for any of the following reasons:
To provide goods or services to you as a consumer;
To detect and resolve issues related to security or functionality;
To comply with legal obligations;
To conduct public interest research;
In the exercise of free speech or the free speech of others; and
For use in internal work processes and purposes that you would reasonably expect based on your relationship with us.
If we determine that we will not delete your Personal Information when you request us to do so, we will inform you and tell you why we are not deleting it.
We will not discriminate against you for the exercise of your rights under the CCPA.  We will not deny you goods or services, charge a different rate or price to you, or supply a different level or quality of goods to you.  We may, however, offer different prices, levels of service or quality to those who share their Personal Information based on the value of the Personal Information provided as permitted by law.  To the extent certain of our services require your Personal Information and you choose not to provide the necessary Personal Information, you may not be able to use those services.
In order to submit a Verifiable Consumer Request, please submit your name, customer or account email address, and a description of your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it, to:
Yik Yak, Inc.
hello@yikyak.com
28475 Greenfield Road
Suite 113 #7226
Southfield, MI 48076
615-200-7392
If you maintain an online account with us, we may verify your identity for a request through the normal account authentication process.
You may assign a designated agent to make a request on your behalf.  If you wish to do so, you will need to appoint the designated agent in writing, and we may require a copy of that writing before allowing any request submitted by your designated agent.  The designated agent would follow the same procedure outlined above to make a request on your behalf.
If we are unable to confirm your identity or authority to make the request, we may contact you for additional information or deny your request.  We will inform you if we cannot verify your identity or authority.  We will only use Personal Information provided in a Verifiable Consumer Request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will respond to the request within 45 days of its receipt.  If we require more time (up to 90 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing.  The information may be delivered through your account, or, if you do not maintain an account with us, by mail or electronically at your option, and if provided electronically, the information will be in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily useable format that allows you to transmit the information to another entity without hindrance.
We are not required to respond to requests to provide Personal Information to you more than twice in any 12-month period.  Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding the receipt of the request.  The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded.  If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
In responding to your request, we are not permitted to disclose or provide you with your Social Security Number, Driver’s License Number, or other government issued identification number, financial account number, any health insurance or medical identification number, an account password, or security questions and answers.
We currently do not respond to any Do Not Track signals or similar signals.
The rights set forth here are in addition to the rights contained in our Privacy Policy.  In the event the rights here conflict with those contained in our Privacy Policy, the portion that provides you with the most protection with regard to your Personal Information will prevail.
If you have any questions or concerns, please contact us at:
Yik Yak, Inc.
hello@yikyak.com
28475 Greenfield Road
Suite 113 #7226
Southfield, MI 48076
615-200-7392
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://yikyak.notion.site/4cba37f3c1c94f0daeba9fb2cc5cd8e3:
Yik Yak Privacy Policy
Last updated May 10, 2024.
California residents
: If you are a California resident, please read the
Notice to California residents
below in addition to this Privacy Policy for information about your personal information and privacy rights.
UK users
: If you are located in the United Kingdom (“
UK
”), please read the
Notice to UK Users
below in addition to this Privacy Policy for information about your personal information and your privacy rights.
This Privacy Policy describes how Flower Ave Inc. (creator of Sidechat and Yik Yak) ("
Flower Ave
," "
we
", “
us
” or "
our
") processes personal information that we collect through our digital or online properties or services that link to this Privacy Policy (including as applicable, our websites, mobile applications (including Sidechat and Yik Yak), social media pages, marketing activities, live events and other activities described in this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Service
”)).
Personal information we collect
How we use your personal information
How we share your personal information
Your choices
Other sites and services
Security
International data transfer
Children
Changes to this Privacy Policy
How to contact us
Notice to California residents
Notice to residents of other U.S. states
Notice to UK users
Information you provide to us.
Personal information you may provide to us through the Service or otherwise includes:
Contact data
, such as your email address, billing and mailing addresses, school name, and phone number.
Demographic data
, such as your city, state, country of residence, postal code, and age.
Profile data
,
such as the username and password that you may set to establish an online account on the Service, date of birth, biographical details, preferences, and any other information that you add to your account profile.
Communications data
based on our exchanges with you, including when you contact us through the Service, social media, or otherwise.
User-generated content data
, such as photos, images, music, videos, comments, questions, messages, works of authorship, and other content or information that you generate, transmit, or otherwise make available on the Service, as well as associated metadata. Metadata includes information on how, when, where and by whom a piece of content was collected and how that content has been formatted or edited. Metadata also includes information that users can add or can have added to their content, such as keywords, geographical or location information, and other similar data.
Other data
not specifically listed here, which we will use as described in this Privacy Policy or as otherwise disclosed at the time of collection.
Third-party sources.
We may combine personal information we receive from you with personal information falling within one of the categories identified above that we obtain from other sources, such as:
Third-party services
that you use to log into, or otherwise link to, your Service account. This data may include your email and other information associated with your account on that third-party service that is made available to us based on your account settings on that service.
Automatic data collection.
We, our service providers, and our business partners may automatically log information about you, your computer or mobile device, and your interaction over time with the Service, our communications and other online services, such as:
Device data
,
such as your computer or mobile device’s operating system type and version, manufacturer and model, browser type, screen resolution, RAM and disk size, CPU usage, device type (e.g., phone, tablet), IP address, unique identifiers (including identifiers used for advertising purposes), language settings, mobile device carrier, radio/network information (e.g., Wi-Fi, LTE, 3G), and general location information such as city, state or geographic area.
Online activity data
, such as pages or screens you viewed, how long you spent on a page or screen, your interactions and engagements with advertisements on our Services, the website you visited before browsing to the Service, navigation paths between pages or screens, information about your activity on a page or screen, access times and duration of access, and whether you have opened our emails or clicked links within them.
Precise Geolocation data
when you authorize our mobile application or the Service to access your device’s location.
Communication interaction data
such
as your interactions with our email, text or other communications (e.g., whether you open and/or forward emails) – we may do this through use of pixel tags (which are also known as clear GIFs), which may be embedded invisibly in our emails.
Cookies and other technologies
. Some of our automatic data collection is facilitated by cookies and other technologies. For more information, see our
Cookie Notice
. We will also store a record of your preferences in respect of the use of these technologies in connection with the Service.
Data about others.
We may offer features that help users invite their friends or contacts to use the Service, and we may collect contact details about these invitees so we can deliver their invitations. Please do not refer someone to us or share their contact details with us unless you have their permission to do so.
We may use your personal information for the following purposes or as otherwise described at the time of collection:
Service delivery and operations.
We may use your personal information to:
provide, operate and improve the Service and our business;
personalize the service, including remembering the devices from which you have previously logged in and remembering your selections and preferences as you navigate the Service;
establish and maintain your user profile on the Service;
facilitate your invitations to friends who you want to invite to join the Service;
enable security features of the Service, such as by sending you security codes via email or SMS, and remembering devices from which you have previously logged in;
communicate with you about the Service, including by sending Service-related announcements, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
communicate with you about events or contests in which you participate;
understand your needs and interests, and personalize your experience with the Service and our communications; and
provide support for the Service, and respond to your requests, questions and feedback.
Research and development.
We may use your personal information for research and development purposes, including to analyze and improve the Service and our business and to develop new products and services.
Service improvement and analytics.
We may use your personal information to analyze your usage of the Service, improve the Service, improve the rest of our business, help us understand user activity on the Service, including which pages are most and least visited and how visitors move around the Service, as well as user interactions with our emails, and to develop new products and services.
Compliance and protection.
We may use your personal information to:
comply with applicable laws, lawful requests, and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas, investigations or requests from government authorities;
protect our, your or others’ rights, privacy, safety or property (including by making and defending legal claims);
audit our internal processes for compliance with legal and contractual requirements or our internal policies;
enforce the terms and conditions that govern the Service; and
prevent, identify, investigate and deter fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft.
With your consent.
In some cases, we may specifically ask for your consent to collect, use or share your personal information, such as when required by law.
To create aggregated, de-identified and/or anonymized data.
We may create aggregated, de-identified and/or anonymized data from your personal information and other individuals whose personal information we collect. We make personal information into de-identified and/or anonymized data by removing information that makes the data identifiable to you. We may use this aggregated, de-identified and/or anonymized data and share it with third parties for our lawful business purposes, including to analyze and improve the Service and promote our business.
Retention.
We generally retain personal information to fulfill the purposes for which we collected it. The criteria we use to determine the retention period are whether those purposes are fulfilled and whether we need to retain it for purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements, to establish or defend legal claims, or for fraud prevention purposes.
When we no longer require the personal information, we have collected about you, we may either delete it, anonymize it, or isolate it from further processing.
We may share your personal information with the following parties and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy, in other applicable notices, or at the time of collection.
Affiliates.
Our corporate parent, subsidiaries, and affiliates for purposes consistence with this Privacy Policy.
Service providers.
Third parties
that provide services on our behalf or help us operate the Service or our business (such as hosting, information technology, customer support, email delivery, marketing, consumer research and website analytics).
Advertising partners.
Third parties, including advertising platforms and advertisers, to enable the delivery of advertisements that are relevant to your interests, analyze and understand user behavior and trends, improve our Services, and optimize the effectiveness of targeted advertising campaigns.
Linked third-party services
. If you log into the Service with, or otherwise link your Service account to, a third-party service, we may share your personal information with that third-party service. The third party’s use of the shared information will be governed by its privacy policy and the settings associated with your account with the third-party service.
Professional advisors.
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, auditors, bankers and insurers, where necessary in the course of the professional services that they render to us.
Authorities and others.
Law enforcement, government authorities, and private parties, as we believe in good faith to be necessary or appropriate for the Compliance and protection purposes described above.
Business transferees
. We may disclose personal information in the context of actual or prospective business transactions (
e.g.,
investments in Flower Ave, financing of Flower Ave, public stock offerings, or the sale, transfer or merger of all or part of our business, assets or shares), for example, we may need to share certain personal information with prospective counterparties and their advisers. We may also disclose your personal information to an acquirer, successor, or assignee of Flower Ave as part of any merger, acquisition, sale of assets, or similar transaction, and/or in the event of an insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership in which personal information is transferred to one or more third parties as one of our business assets.
Other users and the public.
Your profile and other user-generated content (except for messages) are visible to other users of the Service and the public. For example, other users of the Service or the public may have access to your information if you chose to make your profile or other personal information available to them through the Service, such as when you provide comments, reviews, survey responses, or share other content.  This information can be seen, collected and used by others, including being cached, copied, screen captured or stored elsewhere by others (e.g., search engines), and we are not responsible for any such use of this information.
Data obtained through the short code program will not be shared with any third-parties for their marketing reasons/purposes.
In this section, we describe the rights and choices available to all users. Users who are located in California, other U.S. states, and the UK can find additional information about their rights below in the
Notice to California residents
,
Notice to residents of other U.S. states
,
and
Notice to UK Users
,
respectively.
Access or update your information.
If you have registered for an account with us through the Service, you may review and update certain account information by logging into the account.
Cookies and other technologies
. For information about cookies and other technologies employed by the Service and how to control/manage them, see our
Cookie Notice
.
Blocking images/clear gifs:
Most browsers and devices allow you to configure your device to prevent images from loading. To do this, follow the instructions in your particular browser or device settings.
Mobile location data.
You can disable our access to your device’s precise geolocation in your mobile device settings.
Do Not Track.
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to “Do Not Track” signals. To find out more about “Do Not Track,” please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
Declining to provide information.
We need to collect personal information to provide certain services. If you do not provide the information we identify as required or mandatory, we may not be able to provide those services.
Linked third-party platforms.
If you choose to connect to the Service through a third-party platform, you may be able to use your settings in your account with that platform to limit the information we receive from it. If you revoke our ability to access information from a third-party platform, that choice will not apply to information that we have already received from that third party.
Delete your content or close your account.
You can choose to delete certain content through your account. If you wish to request to close your account, you may do so within the settings page in your profile or you may
contact us
.
The Service may contain links to websites, mobile applications, and other online services operated by third parties. In addition, our content may be integrated into web pages or other online services that are not associated with us. These links and integrations are not an endorsement of, or representation that we are affiliated with, any third party. We do not control websites, mobile applications or online services operated by third parties, and we are not responsible for their actions. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of the other websites, mobile applications and online services you use.
We employ a number of technical, organizational and physical safeguards designed to protect the personal information we collect. However, security risk is inherent in all internet and information technologies, and we cannot guarantee the security of your personal information.
We are headquartered in the United States and may use service providers that operate in other countries. Your personal information may be transferred to the United States or other locations where privacy laws may not be as protective as those in your state, province, or country.
Users in the UK should read the important information provided in the
Notice to UK Users
below about transfer of personal information outside of the UK.
The Service is not intended for use by anyone under 13 years of age. If you are a parent or guardian of a child from whom you believe we have collected personal information in a manner prohibited by law, please
contact us
. If we learn that we have collected personal information through the Service from a child without the consent of the child’s parent or guardian as required by law, we will comply with applicable legal requirements to delete the information.
We reserve the right to modify this Privacy Policy at any time. If we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will notify you by updating the date of this Privacy Policy and posting it on the Service or other appropriate means. Any modifications to this Privacy Policy will be effective upon our posting the modified version (or as otherwise indicated at the time of posting). In all cases, your use of the Service after the effective date of any modified Privacy Policy indicates your acknowledging that the modified Privacy Policy applies to your interactions with the Service and our business.
Email:
support@flowerave.nyc
Mail:
510 LaGuardia Pl, #2, New York, NY 10012
Phone:
(914) 573-4986‬
This notice describes our collection, use and disclosure of personal information of California residents in our capacity as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) and their rights with respect to their personal information. For purposes of this notice, “personal information” and “sensitive personal information” have the meanings given in the CCPA but do not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA.
Your privacy rights.
As a California resident, you have the following rights under the CCPA:
Right to know.
You can request information about the categories of personal information that we have collected; the categories of sources from which we collected personal information; the business or commercial purpose for collecting, sharing and/or selling personal information; the categories of any personal information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose; and the categories of any third parties with whom personal information was sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
Right to access.
You can request a copy of certain personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to deletion.
You can request that we delete personal information that we collected from you.
Right to correction
. You can request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to opt out of selling/sharing
. To submit a request to opt out of the sale or sharing of your information please follow the instructions set out under “Information practices” below.
Nondiscrimination
.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination as prohibited by the CCPA.
Identity verification
. You may submit requests to exercise your right to know, access, deletion and correction via email to
support@flowerave.nyc
. The rights described above are not absolute, and in certain cases, we may decline your request as permitted by law. We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it.
Authorized agents.
We need to verify your identity to process your requests to exercise your rights to know, access, deletion, and correction, and we reserve the right to confirm your California residency. To verify your identity, we may require you to log into an online account if you have one, provide identifiers we can match against information we may have collected from you previously, confirm your request using the email or telephone account stated in the request, provide government identification, or provide a declaration under penalty of perjury, where permitted by law.
Your authorized agent may make a request on your behalf upon our verification of the agent’s identity and our receipt of a copy of a valid power of attorney given to your authorized agent pursuant to applicable state law. If you have not provided your agent with such a power of attorney, we may ask you and/or your agent to take additional steps permitted by law to verify that your request is authorized, such as information required to verify your identity and that you have given the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Information practices.
The following describes our practices currently and during the past 12 months:
Sources and purposes
. We collect all categories of personal information from the sources and use them for the business/commercial purposes described above in the Privacy Policy.
Sales and sharing of personal information
. While we do not “sell” or “share” personal information for monetary consideration, and have no actual knowledge that we have sold or shared the personal information of California residents under 16 years of age, we partner with third party advertising companies, including Google, and share the following categories of personal information about California residents for advertising and marketing purposes that may be viewed as a “sale” or “sharing” under the CCPA: identifiers, Internet or similar network activity, geolocation data (such as IP address) and inferences drawn from other personal information. You may opt out of the sharing or selling of your information for such purposes by clicking on the Digital Advertising Alliance "YourAdChoices" icon, displayed at the top right corner of each advertisement, and turn off "Personalize ads on this app". You can also request to opt out by emailing us
at
contact@flowerave.nyc.
Sensitive personal information
. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes that California residents have a right to limit under the CCPA.
Retention
. The criteria for deciding how long to retain personal information is generally based on whether such period is sufficient to fulfill the purposes for which we collected it as described in this notice, including complying with our legal obligations.
Deidentification.
We do not to attempt to reidentify deidentified information derived from personal information, except for the purpose of testing whether our deidentification processes comply with applicable law.
Collection and disclosure
. The chart below describes the personal information we collect by reference to the categories of personal information specified in the CCPA (Cal. Civ. Code §1798.140), and the categories of third parties to whom we disclose it. The terms in the chart refer to the categories of information and third parties described above in this Privacy Policy in more detail. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described below. We may also disclose personal information to professional advisors, law enforcement and government authorities, and business transferees as described above in the How We Share your Personal Information section of this Privacy Policy.
Statutory category/personal information we collect
Categories of third parties to whom we disclose the personal information for a business purpose
Identifiers
• Contact data
• Demographic data
• Profile data
• Communications data 
• User-generated content 
• Data about others
• Affiliates
• Service providers
• Other users and the public
Identifiers (online)
• Contact data
• Demographic data
• Profile data
• User-generated content 
• Communications data 
• Data about others Device data
• Affiliates
• Service providers
• Other users and the public 
• Other users and the public
California Customer Records
(as defined in California Civil Code §1798.80)
• Contact data
• Demographic data
• Profile data
• Communications data 
• User-generated content 
• Data about others
• Affiliates
• Service providers
• Other users and the public
Commercial Information
• Contact data
• Demographic data
• Profile data
• Communications data 
• Online activity data
• Affiliates
• Service providers
•
Internet or Network Information
• Device data
• Online activity data
• Communications data
• Affiliates
• Service providers
Education Information
• Contact data
• Affiliates
• Service providers
Inferences
May be derived from:
• Contact data
• Demographic data
• Communications data 
• User-generated content 
• Online activity data
• Affiliates
• Service providers
• Other users and the public
Protected Classification Characteristics
May be included or revealed in:
• Contact data
• Demographic data
• Affiliates
• Service providers
If you are a California resident, please see the section above, Notice to California Residents,
for information on your rights in relation to information that we have collected about you. If you are a resident of another U.S. state, and depending on the state you live in, you may have some or all of the rights listed below in relation to information that we have collected about you. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases, we may decline your request as permitted by law, including in the event you reside in a state that does not currently grant you these rights.
Right to Access
. You may have a right to request that we confirm whether we process information about you and give you access to that information in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the information to another business without impediment.
Right to Delete.
You may have a right to request that we delete information we maintain about you.
Right to Correct
. You may have a right to request that we correct inaccurate information we maintain about you.
Right to Opt-out of Targeted Advertising or Selling
. You may have a right to opt-out of the processing of your information for the purposes of targeted advertising and the sale of your information (as all such terms and concepts are defined under applicable law). For information on how we process opt-out preference signals, see our Cookie Notice.
Note that because we do not sell personal information for monetary consideration, we do not “sell” personal information as defined under certain state laws (including Virginia).
You may opt out of the sharing or selling of your information for targeted advertising purposes by clicking on the Digital Advertising Alliance "YourAdChoices" icon, displayed at the top right corner of each advertisement, and turn off "Personalize ads on this app". You can also request to opt out by emailing us
at
contact@flowerave.nyc. We may need to collect information from you to verify your identity, any may request you to log into an online account if you have one, provide identifiers we can match against information we may have collected from you previously, confirm your request using the email or telephone account stated in the request, provide government identification, or provide a declaration under penalty of perjury, where permitted by law before providing a substantive response to the request. Depending on your location, you may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney document, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights. Before accepting such a request from an agent, we will require that the agent provide proof you have authorized them to act on your behalf, and we may need you to verify your identity directly with us.
In addition, you may have the right to appeal our decision regarding a request related to these rights by contacting us using the information provided below. When you submit a request or launch an appeal, we will limit our collection of your information to only what is necessary to securely fulfil your request or process your appeal. We will not require you or your authorized agent to pay a fee for the verification of your request or appeal.
Where this Notice to UK users applies.
The information provided in this “Notice to UK users” section applies only to individuals located in the United Kingdom (UK).
Personal Information
. References to “information” in this Privacy Policy are equivalent to “personal data” as governed by the UK data protection legislation. Essentially, it boils down to information about an individual, from which that individual is either directly identified or can be identified. It does not include ‘anonymous data’ (i.e., information where the identity of individual has been permanently removed). The personal information that we collect from you is identified and described in greater detail in the section personal information we collect.
Controlle
r. Flower Ave is the controller of your personal information covered by this Privacy Policy for purposes of UK data protection legislation.  See the
Contact Us
section above for our contact details.
Our GDPR Representative
. We have appointed the following representative in the UK as required by the UK data protection legislation – you can also contact them directly should you wish:
By email to: ukrep@flowerave.nyc
By postal mail to: The DPO Centre Ltd, 50 Liverpool Street, London, EC2M 7PY, UK
Legal bases for processing
. We use your personal information only as permitted by law. The UK data protection legislation requires us to ensure we have a “legal basis” for each purpose for which we collect your personal information. Our legal bases for processing the personal information described in this Privacy Policy are described in the table below:
Where we need to perform a contract that we are about to enter into, or have entered into, with you (“
Contractual Necessity
”).
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests (“
Legitimate Interests
”). More detail about the specific legitimate interests pursued in respect of each purpose we use your personal information for is set out in the table below.
Where we need to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation (“
Compliance with Law
”).
Where we have your specific consent to carry out the processing for the purpose in question (“
Consent
”).
We set out below the legal bases we rely on in respect of the relevant purposes for which we use your personal information.
For Service Delivery
Categories of personal information
: Contact data, Demographic Information, Communications, User-generated content
Legal Basis
: Contractual Necessity – Processing is necessary to perform the contract governing our provision of our services or to take steps that you request prior to signing up for the services. If we have not entered into a contract with you, we process your personal information based on our legitimate interest in providing the services you access and request.
For Research and Development
Categories of personal information
: Contact data, Demographic Information, Communications, User-generated content
Legal Basis
: Legitimate Interests – We process your personal information based on our legitimate interest in improving our Services. We have a legitimate interest in analyzing how the Services are used in order to improve them.
Compliance and protection
Categories of personal information
: Contact data, Demographic Information, Communications, User-generated content
Legal Basis
: Compliance with Law – Processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations.
Use for new purposes
. We may use your personal information for reasons not described in this Privacy Policy where permitted by law and the reason is compatible with the purpose for which we collected it.  If we need to use your personal information for an unrelated purpose, we will notify you and explain the applicable legal basis.
No sensitive personal information.
We ask that you not provide us with any sensitive personal information (e.g., social security numbers, information related to racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religion or other beliefs, health, biometrics or genetic characteristics, criminal background or trade union membership) on or through the Services, or otherwise to us. If you provide us with any sensitive personal information to us when you use the Services, you must consent to our processing and use of such sensitive personal information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. If you do not consent to our processing and use of such sensitive personal information, you must not submit such sensitive personal information through our Services.
No obligation to provide personal information.
You do not have to provide personal information to us. However where we
need
to process your personal information either to comply with applicable law or to deliver our Services to you, and you fail to provide that personal information when requested, we may not be able to provide some or all of our Services to you. We will notify you if this is the case at the time.
No automated decision-making and profiling.
As part of the Services, we do not engage in automated decision-making and/or profiling, which produces legal or similarly significant effects. We will let you know if that changes by updating this Privacy Policy.
Security
. We have put in place procedures designed to deal with breaches of personal information. In the event of such breaches, we have procedures in place to work with applicable regulators. In addition, in certain circumstances (including where we are legally required to do so), we may notify you of breaches affecting your personal information.
Your rights
. The UK data protection legislation gives you certain rights regarding your personal information.  If you are located in the UK, you may ask us to take the following actions in relation to your personal information that we hold:
Right of access
: You can ask us to provide you with information about our processing of your personal information and give you access to your personal information.
Right to rectification
: If the personal information we hold about you is inaccurate or incomplete, you are entitled to request to have it rectified.
Right to erasure
: You can ask us to delete or remove your personal information where there is no lawful reason for us continuing to store or process it, where you have successfully exercised your right to object to processing (see below), where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your personal information to comply with local law.
Right to restrict processing
: You can ask us to suspend the processing of your personal information if: (i) you want us to establish the data's accuracy; (ii) where our use of the data is unlawful but you do not want us to erase it; (iii) where you need us to hold the data even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (iv) you have objected to our use of your data but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Right to object
: Where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or those of a third party) and there is something about your particular situation that makes you want to object to processing on this ground as you feel it impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms.
Right to data portability
: You have the right, in certain circumstances, to ask us to provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your personal information in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format. Note that this right only applies to automated information which you initially provided consent for us to use or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Right to withdraw consent at any time
: Where we are relying on consent to process your personal information you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent.
Please note that some of these rights may be limited where we have an overriding interest or legal obligation to continue to process the personal information or where certain exemptions apply. If we decline your request, we will tell you why, subject to legal restrictions.
To exercise any of these rights, please contact us using the contact details provided above. We may request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and process your request.
Typically, you will not have to pay a fee to exercise your rights; however, we may charge a reasonable fee if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive or excessive.
We try to respond to all legitimate requests within a month of receipt. It may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or if you have made a number of requests; in this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
Although we urge you to contact us first to find a solution for every concern you may have, you always have the right to lodge a complaint with the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You can find information about how to contact the Information Commissioner’s Office here:
https://ico.org.uk/make-a-complaint
.
Cross-border data transfer
. We are headquartered in the United States and may use service providers that operate in the United States or other countries. Therefore, we may transfer your personal information to recipients outside the UK. Some of these recipients are located in countries in respect of which the UK Government has issued adequacy decisions, in which case, the recipient’s country is recognized as providing an adequate level of data protection under UK data protection legislation and the transfer is therefore permitted under Article 45 of the GDPR.
Some recipients of your personal information may be located in countries outside the UK for which the UK Government has not issued adequacy decisions in respect of the level of data protection in such countries (“Restricted Country”). For example, at the time of publication of this Privacy Policy, the United States is a Restricted Country. When we transfer your personal information to a recipient in a Restricted Country, we will either:
enter into appropriate data transfer agreements based on the appropriate data transfer mechanism as approved from time-to-time by the UK Information Commissioner’s Office or UK Government, such as the so-called International Data Transfer Agreement; or
rely on other appropriate means permitted by the UK data protection legislation, which establish that such recipients will provide an adequate level of data protection and that appropriate technical and organizational security measures are in place to protect personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss or alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access, and against all other unlawful forms of processing.
You may ask for a copy of such appropriate specific data transfer mechanism by contacting us using the contact detail above.
Notice last updated: May 10, 2024
This Cookie Notice explains how Flower Ave Inc. (creator of Sidechat and Yik Yak) ("
Flower Ave
," "
we
", “
us
” or "
our
") uses cookies and similar technologies in connection with:
any website that we own or control and which posts or links to this Cookie Notice (collectively, the “
Sites
”); and
our mobile app (“
App
”).
What are cookies?
Cookies are small data files that are placed on your computer or mobile device when you visit a website. Cookies serve different purposes, like helping us understand how a site is being used, letting you navigate between pages efficiently, remembering your preferences, and generally improving your browsing experience.
Our Sites may use both session cookies (which expire once you close your web browser) and persistent cookies (which stay on your computer or mobile device until you delete them).
We use two broad categories of cookies: (1) first party cookies, served directly by us to your computer or mobile device, which we use to recognize your computer or mobile device when it revisits our Sites; and (2) third-party cookies, which are served by service providers and our third party advertising partners, or business partners on our Sites, and can be used by these parties to recognize your computer or mobile device when it visits other websites. Third-party cookies can be used for a variety of purposes, including site analytics, advertising, and social media features.
What types of cookies and similar tracking technologies do we use on the Sites and App?
We use cookies and other tracking technologies in the following categories described in the table below.
Type
Description
Who serves the cookies
(link to privacy policy/site)
How to control them
Analytics
These cookies help us understand how our services is performing and being used. These cookies may work with web beacons included in emails we send to track which emails are opened and which links are clicked by recipients.
Google Analytics
You can find out more information about Google Analytics cookies
here
and about how Google protects your data
here
. You can prevent the use of Google Analytics relating to your use of our Sites by downloading and installing a browser plugin available
here
.
See ‘your choices’ below.
Essential
These cookies are necessary to allow the technical operation of our services (e.g., they enable you to move around on a website and to use its features).
Google Tag Manager
See ‘your choices’ below.
Functionality / performance
These cookies help us collect information about the traffic to our services and enhance the performance and functionality of our services. The information gathered via these cookies does not directly identify any individual visitor.; however, it may render such visitors ‘indirectly identifiable’.
We use a number of different first party and third-party cookies to achieve this purpose.
See ‘your choices’ below.
Other technologies
In addition to cookies, our Sites may use other technologies, such as Flash technology to pixel tags to collect information automatically.
Browser Web Storage
We may use browser web storage (including via HTML5), also known as locally stored objects (“LSOs”), for similar purposes as cookies. Browser web storage enables the storage of a larger amount of data than cookies. Your web browser may provide functionality to clear your browser web storage.
Web Beacons
We may also use web beacons (which are also known as pixel tags and clear GIFs) on our Sites and in our HTML formatted emails to track the actions of users on our Sites and interactions with our emails. Unlike cookies, which are stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website, pixel tags are embedded invisibly on webpages or within HTML formatted emails. Pixel tags are used to demonstrate that a webpage was accessed or that certain content was viewed, typically to measure the success of our marketing campaigns or engagement with our emails and to compile statistics about usage of the Sites, so that we can manage our content more effectively.
Mobile Application Software Development Kits (SDKs)
We may use third-party software development kits (“SDKs”) in our mobile applications. An SDK is third-party computer code that may be used for a variety of purposes, including to provide us with analytics regarding the use of our mobile applications, to integrate with social media, add features or functionality to our app, or to facilitate online advertising. SDKs may enable third parties to collect information directly via our App.
Your options for controlling what information cookies and similar technologies collect about you include:
Blocking cookies in your browser.
Most browsers let you remove or reject cookies. To do this, follow the instructions in your browser settings. Many browsers accept cookies by default until you change your settings. Please note that if you set your browser to disable cookies, the Sites may not work properly. For more information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
. If you do not accept our cookies, you may experience some inconvenience in your use of our Sites. For example, we may not be able to recognize your computer or mobile device and you may need to log in every time you visit our Sites.
Google Analytics
. You can learn more about Google Analytics cookies
here
, about how Google collects and processes your data
here
, and about how Google protects your data
here
. You can prevent the use of Google Analytics relating to your use of our Sites by downloading and installing a browser plugin available
here
.
Blocking images/clear gifs
: Most browsers and devices allow you to configure your device to prevent images from loading. To do this, follow the instructions in your particular browser or device settings.
Blocking advertising ID use in your mobile settings
. Your mobile device settings may provide functionality to limit use of the advertising ID associated with your mobile device for interest-based advertising purposes.
For more information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
. If you do not accept our cookies, you may experience some inconvenience in your use of our Sites. For example, we may not be able to recognize your computer or mobile device and you may need to log in every time you visit our Sites.
If you choose to opt-out of targeted advertisements, you will still see advertisements online, but they may not be relevant to you. Even if you do choose to opt out, not all companies that serve online behavioral advertising are included in this list, and so you may still receive some cookies and tailored advertisements from companies that are not listed.
For more information about how we collect, use and share your information, see our
Privacy Policy
.
Information about the cookies we use may be updated from time to time, so please check back on a regular basis for any changes.
If you have any questions about this Cookie Notice, please contact us by email at
contact@flowerave.nyc
Notion uses cookies. See
Cookie Notice
for details.
Accept all
Reject all
Sub-policy 1
https://www.yikyak.com/privacy:
